texlive2021/texmf-dist/tex/generic/dehyph-exptl/dehyphn-x-2021-02-26.pat
ze4mis
2z3emp
zena4g
ze5natt
ze4n3au
ze2nä
zende4c
zende4k
zen5ebe
zen5en5e
zen5erf
zen5erke
zen5ern
ze4nerw
zen5ess
zen3f
4z5en4ge.
zenge6ne6
4zengp
ze4nid
zen5inn
zenk2
zen3n
ze2n3o
zensch4
zen4sem
zen4ser
zens4po
4z5entna
4z5en4tro
zent3s
zen4z5ar
zen6zert
zen6zerw
zen4zin
zeo2r
ze4pen
ze3p2f
zeppe3
zer3ad
zer3a4g
zer3an
ze4r3at
4z3erbi
zer3ed
6z5ereign
ze4rein
ze4remi
zer5end
zer5erw
4z5erfül
4z5ergae
4z3ergä
zer4gon
4z3er4gu
ze4r3i4d
zerin4d
zerin4h
zerin6st
zerin6te
5zerl.
zer6lang
zer6laub
zer4le.
4z5erleb
zer4len
zerlo4
zer6maec
4z5er4mäc
5zerme
4z5ermit
zer4nan
zer4n5e4b
zer6nerb
zer5obe
ze3rop
ze3ros
ze3rös
2z3erq
zers2
z5ersae
4z5ersat
4z3ersä
6z5er6strec
zer4t5a4g
zer6t5akte
zer4tar
zer6t5emp
zerten4
zerter5
zer6t5ere
zer6terl
zer4t5in
zer4ton
zer6t5rau
zert3s4
zes2a
zes3au
ze3sch
zes3er
zes4ph
zes4sa4
zess5ag
zess5an
zes4seb
zessen4
zes6s5end
zes4ser4
zess5erf
zess5erz
zes6s5ort.
zes6s5or6te.
zes6s5or6ten
zes6s5orts
zes4sp
zes4sum
zes4s5ur4
ze5stau
zes4th
zes4tie
ze5stra
4z3e4tap
4zetat
ze3te
2z3e2th
4zetts
zeug3a
zeu4gei
zeu4gel
zeu4g5e4m
zeuge4n
zeu4g3r
2z3eul
ze3um
ze3ur
2z1e2x1
2z1f2
2zg2
zge3n4a
zger4a
zge6r5in6nu
zger4s5e
2z1h2
zhau4t3
zi5alei
zi5aleng
zi5alim
zi5a4lin
zi3ang
zi2ar
zib2
zi3cho
zich6t5er6
zi4d3ei
3zie
zie4hei
zie4l3a
ziele4
zie4l5eb
zie4lei
zie4l5er
zie4let
zie4l3i
zi3ell
zie2n
zien3s
zie4r5ei
zi3erh
zi5ertu
zi3es.
zi3ess
zi3esu
zi3esz
zif4fr
zi3fl
zi4gec
4z3i4gel
zig3sp
zi4kon
zil4e
zi4mit
2z3imp
zim2t3
2zimu
zi3nal
4z3inde
z4ine
zi4n3et
zi4n3in
4z3i4n3it
zin4k3l
zinks4
zin4na
4z3in4sa
zin5sas
4z5insel
zin4s5er
zin4sk
4zinsuf
zi2o
zio3d
zi3on.
zi3ons
zip4a
zirk2
zirks3
zi3s2z
3zit
zi4t3an
zite2
zithe4
zi2t3o2
2zj
2z1k2
z3ko
zko3ef
z3kr
zkue3b
zkü3b
z3ky
2z1l
zland5er
zlei5ti
zle3s
z3lo
2z1m2
zmau4s
2z1n2
z3ne
znebe4
znei3
zn4eu
2z3o4as
2z1ob
2z3oe2d
zoe2f
3z4oeg
2z3oek
4zoel.
4zoels
z1of
zo2gl
2z1oh
zo4lig
zol4l3a4
zol4l5ei
zol6l5en6t5
zoller4
zol6lerf
zol6l5erk
zol6l5erl
zol6lert
zol4lin
zol4lo
zolls4
zoll5ste
3zon
zon3s2
zon4t5er
3zo2o
zoo3s2
2z3o2pe
2zopt
2z3ora
zo2ri
z4orn
zor4n3a
zor4ner
2z3ort
2z3osz
zo2t3a
2z1ou
zo2w
zo2ze
2z1ö2d
2z1ö2f
3zög
2z1ök
z1öl
2zöl.
2zöle
z2öli
z2öll
2zöls
2z1p2
2zq
2z1r2
z3ra
z3ru
2z1s2
zsau4
zsch2
zse3r4u
z3sh
zsi1
z3sl
zst2
zsu1
2zt
zt3abr
zta2n
z4t3an3e
z4t5anze
z2t3ar
zte3e2
zt3ehe
zt5eins
z4t3ent
z4t3erz
z3t4es
zte3s4k
zte5str
zt3hel
z2t3hi
z2t3ho
z2thu
zt3ind
zt3inf
zt3ins
zt4ram
zt3rec
zt3s2
z4t3urs
ztz2
zu1
zub2
zucht5o
zucht5r
zuchts4
zud2
zudi4e
2zueb
zu3ebb
zu3ebn
zue2k
zu2el
zu2en
zu3ent
zu4erc
zu4ern
zue4r3o4
zu4ers.
zue2t
zuf2
zu4g5ans
zu4g3ar
zu4gat
zug5eis
zu4g5ent
zugg2
zug5inn
zu4g3la
zu4glä
zu4glö
zug2r
zug5rau
zug4san
zug5sti
2z3uhr
zui2
zu3le
2z3ult
zu3lu
2z3um.
2z3umb
zumen4s
2zumf
2zumg
2z3umh
2zumk
2zuml
zu3mo
2zumr
2z3ums
zu3m2u
2z3umw
4z3unab
zu3n2e
4z3unem
4z3unfa
4zunfä
zunge4n5
4zunget
4z3ungl
zungs3
4z3u4nio
2zunr
2z3uns
2zunt
zuo2
zup4fi
zu3r4a
2z3urk
2z3url
2z3urn
2z3urs
2z3urt
zu3s2
zu5sch4
zus4e
zus4p
zut4a
zu3te
zut4r
zuve4
zuz2
2züb
zür3c
2zv
4zwaer
4zwaes
2zwaf
2zwag
2zwah
2zwal
4zwand
z4wang
2z3wap
2zwa2s
zwasse4
2zwäc
2zwär
2zwäs
2zweb
z2wec
4z3wech
2zwed
2zweg
zweg3s
2zweh
5z4weig
4zweil
4zwein
zwei5sc
2zwel
2zwen
z4werg
4zwerk
4zwert
2zwes
z2wic
2zwid
zwi2e
4z5wied
4zwild
5z4wing
4z5wint
4zwirr
4zwirt
z4wisc
4zwiss
z4wist
2zwur
zwur4m3
2zwü
zy3an.
zy2le
zy2m3i
2zz
zz2a
zza3t
zz3en4s
z2z3id
z2z3i2k
zzi2n
zz3ini
zzi3s2
zz2o
zzol2
z2z3or
zz2ö
zzug4s
zz2w
}

\endinput

%%% Local Variables:
%%% mode: tex
%%% coding: utf-8
%%% End:
